Tennessee, session 114, HB1968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-13-203, is amended by deleting
the language "and Purdue Pharma L.P." wherever it appears and substituting instead the
language "Purdue Pharma L.P., Alvogen, Inc., Apotex Corp., and Zydus Pharmaceuticals (USA)
Inc.".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-11-103(p), is amended by
deleting the language "or Purdue Pharma LP." and substituting instead the language "Purdue
Pharma L.P., Alvogen, Inc., Apotex Corp., or Zydus Pharmaceuticals (USA) Inc.".
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or the application of any provision of this act to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to
that end, the provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1968
010350
- 1 -